Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.370

Disposition of building fees and normal school fund revenues—Bond payments—Capital projects accounts.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof all building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:

(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing 12 months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If in any 12-month period it shall appear that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.

(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.

(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

[ 2023 c 474 s 8027; 2021 c 332 s 7029; 2019 c 413 s 7027; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 954; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7029; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7030; 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7024. Prior: 2009 c 499 s 5; 2009 c 497 s 6021; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 49; prior: 1985 c 390 s 47; 1985 c 57 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 79; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.370; prior: 1967 c 47 ss 11, 14; 1965 c 76 s 2; 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 5; 1961 ex.s. c 13 s 4. Formerly RCW 28B.40.370; 28.81.085; 28.81.540.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 43.34.080.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 48: See note following RCW 39.35B.050.

Effective date—2009 c 497: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.